Utah statutes.
23-14-7.   Functions and qualifications of director.
(1)  The director shall:
(a)  be the executive and administrative head of the Division of Wildlife
Resources; and
(b)  have demonstrated ability in management and administration and experience
in the  protection, conservation, restoration, and management of wildlife
resources.
(2)  The director may not hold any other public office or be involved in a
political party or organization.
